New York, session 2025-2026, S4470.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "DJ's law". 3 § 2. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph (d) of subdivision 4 of section 840 4 of the executive law, as added by section 1 of part ZZ of chapter 55 of 5 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 6 (2) The model law enforcement use of force policy shall include, but 7 is not limited to: 8 (i) information on current law as it relates to the use of force by 9 police and peace officers; 10 (ii) guidelines regarding when use of force is permitted; 11 (iii) requirements for documenting use of force; 12 (iv) procedures for investigating use of force incidents; 13 (v) guidelines regarding excessive use of force including duty to 14 intervene, reporting, and timely medical treatment for injured persons; 15 (vi) standards for failure to adhere to use of force guidelines; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08447-06-6 S. 4470--C 2 1 (vii) training mandates on use of force, conflict prevention, conflict 2 resolution and negotiation, de-escalation techniques and strategies, 3 including, but not limited to, interacting with persons presenting in an 4 agitated condition; [and] 5 (viii) prohibited uses of force; and 6 (ix) best practices, policies, and guidelines regarding the discharge 7 of a firearm at a moving vehicle. 8 § 3. Section 840 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 9 subdivision 9 to read as follows: 10 9. The council shall, in addition: 11 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate written policies and procedures 12 regarding use of force by police officers specifically with respect to 13 the discharge of a firearm at a moving vehicle. 14 (b) Recommend to the governor rules and regulations with respect to 15 the establishment and implementation on an ongoing basis of a training 16 program for all current and new police officers as part of required 17 minimum basic training, regarding the policies and procedures estab- 18 lished pursuant to this subdivision, along with recommendations for 19 periodic retraining of police officers. 20 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 21 it shall have become a law.